Hawaii, session 2025, HB1397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§7-     Parental rights.  (a)  Each parent in the State shall have the right to direct the upbringing, education, care, and welfare of the parent's child. (b)  No department or agency of the State or any county shall adopt or ordain any rule, regulation, or ordinance that infringes upon the rights established in subsection (a) without demonstrating that the rule, regulation, or ordinance is narrowly tailored to address a compelling governmental interest using the least restrictive means necessary." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________